Colorado statutes. TITLE 31 Government - Municipal
PART 1
ESTABLISHMENT AND ADMINISTRATION

31-31.5-101. Establishment of the statewide retirement plan - definitions.

The statewide retirement plan is hereby established to provide defined benefit and money purchase retirement benefits to members of employers affiliated with the plan. Initial employers affiliated with the plan include those departments that participated in the statewide defined benefit plan established pursuant to part 4 of article 31 of this title 31, the statewide hybrid plan established pursuant to part 11 of article 31 of this title 31, and the social security supplemental plan established pursuant to part 7 of article 31 of this title 31 as such plans existed before their merger into the statewide retirement plan pursuant to House Bill 22-1034, enacted in 2022.

The board is the trustee of the statewide retirement plan, and has those fiduciary duties to the plan and the members of the plan as expressly provided by law.

The board, as a fiduciary, may delegate one or more of its responsibilities under this article 31.5 but shall maintain its responsibility for oversight of the delegation.

The statewide retirement plan is intended to comply with the qualification requirements specified in section 401(a) of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as amended and applicable to governmental plans, as defined in section 414(d) of said code.

The board may adopt any provision for the plan that is necessary or in the board's judgment prudent to comply with state or federal law.

As used in this article 31.5, unless the context otherwise requires:

"Actuarially sound" means a police officers' or firefighters' pension fund determined by the board to be receiving or scheduled to receive employer and member contributions in each fiscal year equal to the annual contributions actuarially determined to be necessary to pay the annual current service cost of pension benefits attributable to active employees and to pay the annual contribution necessary to amortize any unfunded accrued liability over a period not to exceed forty years. The actuarial cost method to be utilized shall be the entry age-normal cost method. The date from which unfunded liabilities shall be amortized shall be determined pursuant to part 3 of article 30.5 of this title 31.

"Association" means the fire and police pension association created in section 31-31-201 (1).

"Board" means the board of directors established as the governing body of the fire and police pension association as provided in section 31-31-201 (2).

"Employer" means any municipality in this state offering police or fire protection service employing one or more members and any special district, fire authority, or county improvement district in this state offering fire protection service employing one or more members.

"Lifetime benefit components" means the defined benefit component, the social security component, and the hybrid component, as described in this article 31.5, collectively.

"Member" means an active employee who is a full-time salaried employee of a municipality, fire protection district, fire authority, or county improvement district normally serving at least one thousand six hundred hours in any calendar year and whose duties are directly involved with the provision of police or fire protection, as certified by the member's employer. "Member" also includes an active employee who works less than sixteen hundred hours per year but otherwise qualifies as a member and whose employer elects to treat all such other similar employees as members. The term does not include clerical or other personnel whose services are auxiliary to police protection, or any volunteer firefighter, as such term is defined in section 31-30-1102 (9). For the purpose of participation in the statewide defined benefit plan pursuant to part 4 of this article or the statewide money purchase plan pursuant to part 5 of this article 31.5, but not for the purpose of participation in the statewide death and disability plan pursuant to part 8 of this article 31.5, the term may include clerical or other personnel employed by a fire protection district, fire authority, or county improvement district, whose services are auxiliary to fire protection. For the purpose of eligibility for disability or survivor benefits, "member" includes any employee on an authorized leave of absence.

"Money purchase plan" or "money purchase pension plan" means a retirement plan under which:

The employer has a fixed obligation to make an annual contribution to the plan;

An individual account for each member is provided; and

The member's benefits are based solely on the amount contributed to the member's account and any income, expenses, gains, and losses allocated to the member's account.

"Predecessor plans" means the statewide defined benefit plan formerly governed by part 4 of article 31 of this title 31, the statewide hybrid plan formerly governed by part 11 of article 31 of this title 31, and the social security supplemental plan formerly governed by part 7 of article 31 of this title 31.

"Retired member" means any member who is retired, disabled, or eligible for a benefit as provided in section 31-31-404 (2).

Source:

L. 2022:

Entire article added, (HB 22-1034), ch. 61, p. 280, § 1, effective August 10; (1) amended, (SB 22-212), ch. 421, p. 2989, § 98, effective August 10.

Editor's note:

Subsection (5)(i) was numbered as (5)(g) in HB 22-1034 but has been renumbered on revision for ease of location.

31-31.5-102. Administration of the plan.

Contributions and earnings to all components of the statewide retirement plan shall be held in trust as part of the defined benefit system trust fund.

There is hereby established in the defined benefit system trust fund, a lifetime benefits account into which contributions made pursuant to sections 31-31.5-301, 31-31.5-302, and 31-31.5-303 must be deposited. The defined benefits of the lifetime benefit components, including cost of living adjustments provided by the plan pursuant to part 4 of this article 31.5, together with the expenses of administering the lifetime benefit components of the plan, shall be paid from the account. The lifetime benefits account shall be invested within the fire and police members' benefit investment fund.

There is established in the defined benefit system trust fund, a money purchase account into which contributions made pursuant to section 31-31.5-304 must be deposited and assigned to individual accounts and administered pursuant to part 5 of this article 31.5. The board may create subaccounts within the account to adequately track the vesting and the source of money deposited into the account on behalf of each member. The money purchase component account must be invested within the fire and police members' self-directed investment fund.

The board shall keep an accurate account of the assets and liabilities of the lifetime benefits account and the money purchase component account.

The board may adopt by rule such matters as may be necessary to codify the board's interpretation, administration, and management of the statewide retirement plan.

The board may provide for the administration of domestic relations orders issued pursuant to article 10 of title 14 with regard to the plan or its predecessor plans.

Source:

Entire article added, (HB 22-1034), ch. 61, p. 282, § 1, effective August 10.